Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1890.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH EQUITY GRANT FUND.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment and purpose. new text end new text begin The reproductive health equity grant fund is established to ensure access to abortion care in the state. The purpose of this onetime grant is to provide funding to abortion providers, government entities, and nonprofit organizations whose primary function is to provide or facilitate access to abortion care. The grants must be designed to provide support to abortion providers, fund uncompensated care, and increase access to abortion care. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Abortion" means an act, procedure, or use of any instrument, medicine, or drug that is supplied or prescribed for or administered to a pregnant individual that results in the termination of a pregnancy. new text end new text begin (c) "Abortion facility" means facilities recognized by the commissioner of health under lawful rules promulgated by the commissioner for the performance of abortions. new text end new text begin (d) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin (e) "Medical services" means the range of care related to the provision of abortion. new text end new text begin (f) "Program" means the reproductive freedom and equity grant program. new text end new text begin (g) "Provider" means any person who furnishes health services and is licensed or otherwise authorized to render services in the state. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin Organizations eligible to receive grant funding under this section include nonprofit organizations or entities that provide or facilitate access to abortion care. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant procedure. new text end new text begin Eligible programs must apply for a grant under this section in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Commissioner's duties new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may make grant awards with the funds available under this section. In awarding grants, the commissioner must support the abortion care infrastructure of the state while considering the impact of the Dobbs decision. The commissioner shall award grants for the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) increase access to care by growing the capacity of abortion providers to meet present and future care needs, including but not limited to grants that support the recruitment and retention of staff; patient navigators; billing consultants; staff training; investments in technology to facilitate care, including telehealth care, and other operational needs that reflect the intention of increasing access to abortion care; new text end new text begin (2) ensure the affordability of and access to care for anyone who seeks care in the state regardless of their ability to pay for care by funding uncompensated care; new text end new text begin (3) secure the physical and digital infrastructure of facilities providing abortion care, including but not limited to making security system improvements, updating IT systems, and providing de-escalation training; and new text end new text begin (4) provide training to staff and providers in trauma-informed care and cultural competencies in order to best treat all patients. new text end new text begin (b) Within the limits of funds available, the commissioner may award grants that, in the commissioner's judgment, best promote the purposes described in this subdivision, taking into account all of the following: new text end new text begin (1) the extent to which abortions are needed locally; new text end new text begin (2) the ability of the applicant to advance health equity; and new text end new text begin (3) the relative need of the applicant. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner shall make grants under this section beginning no later than January 1, 2026. Determination regarding a grant award shall be made within 30 days of receipt of a completed application. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may use up to one percent of the funds available for this section to pay the costs incurred by the department in administering the grant program. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Privacy. new text end new text begin The department or commissioner shall not request, adopt rules to, or otherwise require any abortion provider or nonprofit organization receiving money from the grant fund to divulge the name, address, photograph, license number, email address, phone number, or any other personally identifying information of any patient or individual who sought or received practical support from a provider or organization, in conjunction with the funding provided under this section. Any nonprofit organization or provider receiving funds from the program shall take all necessary steps to ensure the confidentiality of the individuals receiving services in accordance with state and federal laws. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Severability. new text end new text begin If any provision, word, phrase, or clause of this section or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect the provisions, words, phrases, clauses, or applications of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision, word, phrase, clause, or application. The provisions, words, phrases, and clauses of this section are severable. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $30,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for the reproductive health equity grant fund in section 1. new text end